Washington statutes.
RCW 35.86.910

Chapter prevails over inconsistent laws.

Insofar as the provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, the provisions of this chapter shall be controlling.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.86.910. Prior: 1959 c 302 s 9.]